foma/synthesis/grammar.foma
read lexc lexicon.lexc
define Lexicon;

define Exceptions {goose+Pl} .x. {geese};

define EInsertion [..] -> e || s | z | x | c h | s h _ "^" s;

define YReplacement y -> i e || _ "^" s;

define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define Grammar Lexicon           .o.
               EInsertion        .o.
               YReplacement      .o.
               Cleanup;

regex Exceptions .P. Grammar;
